Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 4 Garnishment Forms
18-4-89.
Release of garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

RELEASE OF GARNISHMENT To:
Garnishee This is to notify you that you have been released from filing a Garnishee Answer to any and all Summons of Garnishment or Summons of Continuing Garnishment pending as of this date in the above-styled case. This release authorizes you to pay or deliver to the Defendant in garnishment any money or other property in your possession belonging to the Defendant. This release does not terminate the garnishment proceedings, nor does this release relieve you of any obligation placed on you by the service of a Summons of Garnishment subsequent to this date. This day of , 20. Clerk, Court of County CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE This is to certify that I have this day served the Plaintiff or Plaintiff’s Attorney, the Defendant, and the Garnishee in the foregoing matter with a copy of this pleading by depositing it in the United States Mail in a properly addressed envelope with adequate postage thereon. This day of , 20. Deputy Clerk of Court”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-89

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-90.
Modification of continuing garnishment.

“IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) Plaintiff ) ) v. ) Civil Action File No. ) ) Defendant ) ) ) Garnishee )

Click to view

MODIFICATION OF CONTINUING GARNISHMENT To: Garnishee This is to notify you that the undersigned Plaintiff and Defendant have agreed to a modification of the above-styled garnishment action. Upon receipt of service of a legible copy of this document, stamped by the garnishment court, with the signatures of both Plaintiff and Defendant affixed and fully notarized, the Summons of Garnishment served upon you in this action is superseded as follows: you are commanded instead to make the following deduction from all obligations owed to the Defendant during the remaining garnishment period of the above- styled garnishment action: 1) The sum of $ per week/two weeks/month/paycheck (circle one); 2) % of the disposable income of Defendant; or 3) % of the gross amount due the Defendant for (state payment basis, e.g., invoice, monthly draw, all goods and services, etc.). You are authorized and instructed to deliver such amount(s) to Plaintiff directly, by any electronic or other mechanism provided to you by Plaintiff if acceptable to you, or payable and addressed to: (Plaintiff or attorney/firm name) (Plaintiff or attorney street address) (Plaintiff or attorney city, state, ZIP Code) This Modification does not terminate the garnishment action, nor does it relieve you of the obligation to file answers of garnishment with the garnishment court and to serve such answers on the Plaintiff and Defendant within the times and in the manner prescribed by law. This Modification is effective only upon service on you of a file-stamped copy of same. Agreed to by: Sign: Sign: Print: Print: Title (if any) Title (if any) Plaintiff Defendant or Representative/Attorney Executed before me by , Executed before me by , this day of , 20 this day of , 20 Notary Public/Clerk Notary Public/Clerk”

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 35/SB 443.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.